North Carolina, session 2025, SB609.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Steele Creek
Community Place, Inc., a nonprofit organization, to support an initiative to connect opportunities
and resources with the needs of all people of all backgrounds in the Steele Creek area to increase
community health and wellness. These funds shall be allocated equally among the following
focus areas: (i) upward mobility and networking, (ii) physical wellness, (iii) family partnership,
and (iv) mental health.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Steele Creek Fire and Rescue
Service, Inc., a nonprofit organization, to support the needs of the fire department, including the
purchase of a self-contained breathing apparatus (SCBA), a ladder truck, a fire/rescue boat along
with a boathouse for said fire boat, and real property/building for training.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the North Carolina
Department of Transportation the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year for a comprehensive traffic study of traffic
patterns and potential changes to Shopton Road West from South Tryon to Highway 160.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S609-v-1*